test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-Clex_rammud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - rammuđ: # MLO
    rammuđ+V+Inf: rammuđ
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rammuum
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rammuuh
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rámmoo
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: rámmojeen
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: rammuuvettee
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: rammuv
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: rammup
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: rammuuvetteđ
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rámmojeh
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rámmojim
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: rámmojih
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rammui
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: rammuim
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: rammuid
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: rammuin
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: rammuim
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: rammuid
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: rámmojii
    rammuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: rammuuččim
    rammuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: rammuuččih
    rammuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: rammuuččij
    rammuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: rammuuččáim
    rammuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: rammuuččáid
    rammuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: rammuuččáin
    rammuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: rammuuččijm
    rammuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: rammuuččijd
    rammuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: rammuuččii
    rammuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: rammuužeem
    rammuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: rammuužeeh
    rammuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: rammuš
    rammuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: rammuužeen
    rammuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: rammušvettee
    rammuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: rammuužává
    rammuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: rammuužep
    rammuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: rammušvetteđ
    rammuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: rammuužeh

    rammuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: rammuu
    rammuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: rámmojus
    rammuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: rámmojoon
    rammuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: rámmojee
    rammuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: rámmojus
    rammuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: rámmojop
    rammuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: rammuđ
    rammuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: rámmojus
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: rammuu
    rammuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: rammum
    rammuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: rammuuččii
    rammuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: rammuužii 
    rammuđ+V+PrsPrc: [rámmojeijee, rámmojijjee]
    rammuđ+V+PrfPrc: rammum
    rammuđ+V+Actio+Nom: rammum
    rammuđ+V+Actio+Ess: rammuumin
    rammuđ+V+Actio+Loc: rammuumist
    rammuđ+V+Actio+Ill: rammuumân
    rammuđ+V+Actio+Com: rammuudijn
    rammuđ+V+VAbess: rammuuhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - oinuđ: # MLO
    oinuđ+V+Inf: oinuđ
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oinuum
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: oinuuh
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáinoo
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uáinojeen
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: oinuuvettee
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: oinuv
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: oinup
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: oinuuvetteđ
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáinojeh
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uáinojim
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uáinojih
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oinui
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: oinuim
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: oinuid
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: oinuin
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: oinuim
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: oinuid
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uáinojii
    oinuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: oinuuččim
    oinuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: oinuuččih
    oinuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: oinuuččij
    oinuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: oinuuččáim
    oinuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: oinuuččáid
    oinuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: oinuuččáin
    oinuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: oinuuččijm
    oinuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: oinuuččijd
    oinuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: oinuuččii
    oinuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: oinuužeem
    oinuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: oinuužeeh
    oinuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: oinuš   
    oinuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: oinuužeen
    oinuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: oinušvettee 
    oinuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: oinuužává
    oinuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: oinuužep
    oinuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: oinušvetteđ 
    oinuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: oinuužeh

    oinuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: oinuu
    oinuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uáinojus
    oinuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uáinojoon
    oinuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uáinojee
    oinuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uáinojus
    oinuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uáinojop
    oinuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: oinuđ
    oinuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uáinojus
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: oinuu
    oinuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: oinum
    oinuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: oinuuččii
    oinuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: oinuužii
    oinuđ+V+PrsPrc: [uáinojeijee, uáinojijjee]
    oinuđ+V+PrfPrc: oinum
    oinuđ+V+Actio+Nom: oinum
    oinuđ+V+Actio+Ess: oinuumin
    oinuđ+V+Actio+Loc: oinuumist
    oinuđ+V+Actio+Ill: oinuumân
    oinuđ+V+Actio+Com: oinuudijn
    oinuđ+V+VAbess: oinuuhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - kulluđ: # MLO
    kulluđ+V+Inf: kulluđ
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kulluum
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kulluuh
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kulloo
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kullojeen
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kulluuvettee
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kulluv
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kullup
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kulluuvetteđ
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kullojeh
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kullojim
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kullojih
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kullui
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kulluim
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kulluid
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kulluin
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kulluim
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kulluid
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kullojii
    kulluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kulluuččim
    kulluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kulluuččih
    kulluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kulluuččij
    kulluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kulluuččáim
    kulluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kulluuččáid
    kulluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kulluuččáin
    kulluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kulluuččijm
    kulluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kulluuččijd
    kulluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kulluuččii
    kulluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kulluužeem
    kulluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kulluužeeh
    kulluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kulluš  
    kulluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kulluužeen
    kulluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: kullušvettee 
    kulluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kulluužává
    kulluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kulluužep
    kulluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: kullušvetteđ
    kulluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kulluužeh

    kulluđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kulluu
    kulluđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kullojus
    kulluđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kullojoon
    kulluđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kullojee
    kulluđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kullojus
    kulluđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kullojop
    kulluđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kulluđ
    kulluđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kullojus
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kulluu
    kulluđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kullum
    kulluđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kulluuččii
    kulluđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kulluužii
    kulluđ+V+PrsPrc: [kullojeijee, kullojijjee]
    kulluđ+V+PrfPrc: kullum
    kulluđ+V+Actio+Nom: kullum
    kulluđ+V+Actio+Ess: kulluumin
    kulluđ+V+Actio+Loc: kulluumist
    kulluđ+V+Actio+Ill: kulluumân
    kulluđ+V+Actio+Com: kulluudijn
    kulluđ+V+VAbess: kulluuhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - lappuđ: # MLO
    lappuđ+V+Inf: lappuđ
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lappuum
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lappuuh
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: láppoo
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: láppojeen
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: lappuuvettee
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: lappuv
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lappup
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lappuuvetteđ
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: láppojeh
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: láppojim
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: láppojih
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lappui
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: lappuim
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: lappuid
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: lappuin
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lappuim
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lappuid
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: láppojii
    lappuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: lappuuččim
    lappuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: lappuuččih
    lappuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: lappuuččij
    lappuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: lappuuččáim
    lappuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: lappuuččáid
    lappuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: lappuuččáin
    lappuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: lappuuččijm
    lappuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: lappuuččijd
    lappuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: lappuuččii
    lappuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: lappuužeem
    lappuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: lappuužeeh
    lappuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: lappuš           
    lappuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: lappuužeen
    lappuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: lappušvettee     
    lappuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: lappuužává
    lappuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: lappuužep
    lappuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: lappušvetteđ      
    lappuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: lappuužeh

    lappuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: lappuu
    lappuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: láppojus
    lappuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: láppojoon
    lappuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: láppojee
    lappuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: láppojus
    lappuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: láppojop
    lappuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: lappuđ
    lappuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: láppojus
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: lappuu
    lappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: lappum
    lappuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: lappuuččii
    lappuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: lappuužii
    lappuđ+V+PrsPrc: [láppojeijee, láppojijjee]
    lappuđ+V+PrfPrc: lappum
    lappuđ+V+Actio+Nom: lappum
    lappuđ+V+Actio+Ess: lappuumin
    lappuđ+V+Actio+Loc: lappuumist
    lappuđ+V+Actio+Ill: lappuumân
    lappuđ+V+Actio+Com: lappuudijn
    lappuđ+V+VAbess: lappuuhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - kihtuđ: # MLO
    kihtuđ+V+Inf: kihtuđ
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kihtuum
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kihtuuh
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kihtoo
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kihtojeen
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kihtuuvettee
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kihtuv
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kihtup
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kihtuuvetteđ
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kihtojeh
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kihtojim
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kihtojih
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kihtui
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kihtuim
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kihtuid
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kihtuin
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kihtuim
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kihtuid
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kihtojii
    kihtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kihtuuččim
    kihtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kihtuuččih
    kihtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kihtuuččij
    kihtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kihtuuččáim
    kihtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kihtuuččáid
    kihtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kihtuuččáin
    kihtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kihtuuččijm
    kihtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kihtuuččijd
    kihtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kihtuuččii
    kihtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kihtuužeem
    kihtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kihtuužeeh
    kihtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kihtuš      
    kihtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kihtuužeen
    kihtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: kihtušvettee      
    kihtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kihtuužává
    kihtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kihtuužep
    kihtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: kihtušvetteđ      
    kihtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kihtuužeh

    kihtuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kihtuu
    kihtuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kihtojus
    kihtuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kihtojoon
    kihtuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kihtojee
    kihtuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kihtojus
    kihtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kihtojop
    kihtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kihtuđ
    kihtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kihtojus
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kihtuu
    kihtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kihtum
    kihtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kihtuuččii
    kihtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kihtuužii
    kihtuđ+V+PrsPrc: [kihtojeijee, kihtojijjee]
    kihtuđ+V+PrfPrc: kihtum
    kihtuđ+V+Actio+Nom: kihtum
    kihtuđ+V+Actio+Ess: kihtuumin
    kihtuđ+V+Actio+Loc: kihtuumist
    kihtuđ+V+Actio+Ill: kihtuumân
    kihtuđ+V+Actio+Com: kihtuudijn
    kihtuđ+V+VAbess: kihtuuhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - šeštuđ: # MLO
    šeštuđ+V+Inf: šeštuđ
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šeštuum
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: šeštuuh
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiäštoo
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: šiäštojeen
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: šeštuuvettee
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: šeštuv
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: šeštup
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: šeštuuvetteđ
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: šiäštojeh
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: šiäštojim
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: šiäštojih
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: šeštui
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: šeštuim
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: šeštuid
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: šeštuin
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: šeštuim
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: šeštuid
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: šiäštojii
    šeštuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: šeštuuččim
    šeštuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: šeštuuččih
    šeštuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: šeštuuččij
    šeštuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: šeštuuččáim
    šeštuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: šeštuuččáid
    šeštuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: šeštuuččáin
    šeštuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: šeštuuččijm
    šeštuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: šeštuuččijd
    šeštuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: šeštuuččii
    šeštuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: šeštuužeem
    šeštuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: šeštuužeeh
    šeštuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: šeštuš      
    šeštuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: šeštuužeen
    šeštuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: šeštušvettee      
    šeštuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: šeštuužává
    šeštuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: šeštuužep
    šeštuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: šeštušvetteđ      
    šeštuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: šeštuužeh
